New Jersey, session 222, S482.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Age-restricted community means a planned real estate development, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.419 (C.45:22A-23), consisting of dwelling units governed by a common set of rules, regulations, or restrictions intended and operated for persons 55 years of age or older. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within this State. Extended power outage means a disruption in service provided by an electric public utility that lasts more than 24 consecutive hours. b.    In the event that there is an extended power outage, the electric public utility that is responsible for providing the service affected by the extended power outage shall provide the following in every age-restricted community affected by the extended power outage, until restoration of electric service after the extended power outage: (1) access to potable water by setting up temporary water distribution stations; (2) cooling stations equipped with air conditioning and adequate seating to accommodate residents or heating stations equipped with heating capabilities and adequate seating to accommodate residents; and (3) charging stations for electronic devices. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.